Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska86-1502
Policy of state.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of this state to ensure that all Nebraskans have access to affordable and reliable communications services in rural high-cost areas, and to ensure the long-term sustainability of infrastructure necessary to preserve such access.

Laws 2023, LB683, § 13.